Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-518
Violator; aid or assist; prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to aid or assist a person who is in violation of section 37-516 or 37-517.

Laws 1978, LB 828, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 274, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-530;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 238.